en: Smetana with 15% to 34% fat
de: Schmand mit 15% bis 34% Fettanteil
fr: Smetana avec 15% à 34% de matières grasses
hr: Smetana sa 15% do 34% masti
ru: Сметана от 15% до 34% жирности, Сметана с массовой долей жира от 15% до 34%

en: Smetana with 15% to 19% fat
de: Schmand mit 15% bis 19% Fettanteil
fr: Smetana avec 15% à 19% de matières grasses
hr: Smetana sa 15% do 19% masti
ru: Сметана от 15% до 19% жирности, Сметана с массовой долей жира от 15% до 19%

en: Smetana with 15% fat
de: Schmand mit 15% Fettanteil
fr: Smetana avec 15% de matières grasses
hr: Smetana sa 15% masti
ru: Сметана 15%, Сметана 15% жирности, Сметана с массовой долей жира 15%

en: Plant-based creams, Plant creams, Dairy-free creams, Dairy-free cream substitutes, Vegan creams
da: Plantebaserede fløder
de: Pflanzliche Sahne, Pflanzenbasierte Sahne
es: Natas vegetales
fi: kasvipohjaiset kermat
fr: Crèmes végétales
hr: Kreme na biljnoj bazi
it: Panna vegetale
nl: Plantaardige romen
pl: Śmietanki roślinne, Śmietany roślinne, Śmietanki na bazie roślin
pt: Alternativas às natas
sv: Växtbaserade grädden

en: Cereal-based creams
da: Kornbaserede fløder
pt: Natas à base de cereais
sv: Spannmålsgrädder

en: Pressurized whipped cream substitutes
fr: Substituts de crème fouettée sous pression

en: Sour cream substitutes, Sour cream alternatives
da: Rømmeerstatninger
fr: Substituts de crème épaisse
pt: Alternativas ao creme azedo
sv: Gräddfilsersättningar

en: Crème fraîche substitutes
da: Cremefraiche-erstatninger, Creme fraiche-erstatninger, Crème fraîche-erstatninger
fr: Substituts de crèmes fraîches
nb: Creme fraiche-erstatninger, Crème fraîche-erstatninger
nn: Creme fraiche-erstatningar, Crème fraîche-erstatningar
pt: Alternativas ao crème fraîche
sv: Crème fraiche-ersättningar

en: Plant-based creams for cooking, Dairy-free creams for cooking
da: Plantebaserede fløder til madlavning
de: Pflanzliche Sahne zum Kochen, Pflanzenbasierte Sahne zum Kochen
es: Natas vegetales para cocinar
fi: Kasvipohjaiset kermat ruuanlaittoon
fr: Crèmes végétales pour cuisiner
hr: Biljne kreme za kuhanje
it: Panna da cucina vegetale
nl: Plantaardige kookromen
pl: Śmietanki roślinne do gotowania, Śmietany roślinne do gotowania, Śmietanki na bazie roślin do gotowania
pt: Natas à base de plantas para cozinhar
ro: Smântână vegetală de gătit
sv: Växtbaserade grädden för matlagning, Växtbaserade matbaser, Växtbaserade matlagningsbaser

en: Coconut milks and creams
bg: Кокосово мляко и сметана
da: Kokosmælke og -fløder
fr: Laits et crèmes de coco
hr: Kokosovo mlijeko i kreme
pt: Leites e cremes de coco
sv: Kokosmjölkar och -grädder

en: Almond-based creams for cooking
da: Mandelbaserede fløder til madlavning
de: Mandelbasierte Sahne zum Kochen
es: Natas vegetales a base de almendra para cocinar
fr: Crèmes végétales à base d'amande pour cuisiner
hr: Kreme na bazi badema za kuhanje
nl: Amandelcreme voor koken
pl: Śmietanki migdałowe do gotowania, Śmietany migdałowe do gotowania, Śmietanki na bazie migdałów do gotowania
pt: Natas à base de amêndoas para cozinhar
sv: Mandelbaserade grädden för matlagning
zh: 杏仁基烹饪奶油

en: Coconut creams, Coconut-based creams for cooking
da: Kokosfløder, Kokosbaserede fløder til madlavning, Kokosnøddebaserede fløder til madlavning
de: Kokosbasierte Sahne zum Kochen
es: Natas vegetales a base de coco para cocinar
fi: Kookospohjaiset kermat ruoanlaittoon
fr: Crèmes de coco, Crème de coco, Crèmes végétales à base de coco pour cuisiner
hr: Kokosovo kreme, Kreme za kuhanje na bazi kokosa
it: Creme a base di cocco per la cottura
nl: Kookkokosromen
pl: Śmietanki kokosowe do gotowania, Śmietany kokosowe do gotowania, Śmietanki na bazie kokosa do gotowania
pt: Cremes de coco, Natas à base de coco para cozinhar
sv: Kokosgrädder, Kokosbaserade grädden för matlagning, Kokosnötbaserade grädden för matlagning

en: Lentil-based creams for cooking
da: Linsebaserede fløder til madlavning
pt: Natas à base de lentilhas para cozinhar
sv: Linsbaserade grädden för matlagning

en: Millet-based creams for cooking
da: Hirsebaserede fløder til madlavning
es: Natas vegetales a base de mijo para cocinar
fr: Crèmes végétales à base de millet pour cuisiner
hr: Kreme na bazi prosa za kuhanje
nl: Gierstroom voor koken
pt: Natas à base de milhete para cozinhar
sv: Hirsbaserade grädden för matlagning

en: Oat-based creams for cooking
da: Havrebaserede fløder til madlavning
es: Natas vegetales a base de avena para cocinar
fr: Crèmes végétales à base d'avoine pour cuisiner
hr: Kreme na bazi zobi za kuhanje
nl: Kookhaverroom, Kookhaverromen, Haverroom voor koken
pl: Śmietanki owsiane do gotowania, Śmietany owsiane do gotowania, Śmietanki na bazie owsa do gotowania
pt: Natas à base de aveia para cozinhar
sv: Havrebaserade grädden för matlagning

en: Rice-based creams for cooking
da: Risbaserede fløder til madlavning
es: Natas vegetales a base de arroz para cocinar
fr: Crèmes végétales à base de riz pour cuisiner
hr: Kreme na bazi riže za kuhanje
nl: Plantaardige rijstcremes
pl: Śmietanki ryżowe do gotowania, Śmietany ryżowe do gotowania, Śmietanki na bazie ryżu do gotowania
pt: Natas à base de arroz para cozinhar
sv: Risbaserade grädden för matlagning

en: Soy-based creams for cooking, Soy cream preparations
da: Sojabaserede fløder til madlavning
de: Sojasahne, Sojasahne zum Kochen, Sojacreme flüssig
es: Natas vegetales a base de soja para cocinar
fi: Soijapohjaiset kermat ruoanlaittoon, Soijakermavalmisteet
fr: Crèmes végétales à base de soja pour cuisiner, Préparations culinaires à base de soja, Crèmes de soja
hr: sojina vrhnja za kuhanje
it: Creme a base di soia per cucina
nl: Plantaardige sojaromen
pl: Śmietanki sojowe do gotowania, Śmietany sojowe do gotowania, Śmietanki na bazie soi do gotowania
pt: Natas à base de soja para cozinhar
sv: Sojabaserade grädden för matlagning

en: Spelt-based creams for cooking
da: Speltbaserede fløder til madlavning
es: Natas vegetales a base de espelta para cocinar
fr: Crèmes végétales à base d'épeautre pour cuisiner
hr: Kreme za kuhanje na bazi pira
nl: Plantaardige speltromen
pt: Natas à base de espelta para cozinhar
sv: Speltbaserade grädden för matlagning

en: Egg substitutes
fr: Substituts des œufs, substituts des oeufs
hr: Zamjene za jaja
pl: Zastępniki jaj, Substytuty jaj

en: Dairy spreads, Dairy spread
bg: Млечни кремове
de: Milchstreichfett
es: La pasta de leche
fi: Maitolevitteet
fr: Produits laitiers à tartiner
he: ממרח חלבי
hr: Mliječni namaz
it: Latticini spalmabili
lt: Pieno užtepėlės
nl: Zuivelsmeersels
pl: Tłuszcze mleczne do smarowania